Utah statutes.
56-1-27.   First-aid kits -- Installation in cabooses.

For the purpose of protecting the health and safety of employees of railroads, the Public Service Commission, hereinafter called the commission, shall prescribe standards of health, sanitation and safety requiring the installation and the maintenance of first-aid kits within cabooses of a type and with contents, as shall be determined by the commission, for use in administering first-aid to employees.



Enacted by Chapter 131, 1961 General Session

